California, session 20252026, SB89.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 3.7 (commencing with Section 105245) is added to Part 5 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 3.7. Glyphosate105245. (a) On and after January 1, 2028, a product that contains glyphosate shall not be sold in this state, except to an individual or business that holds a valid license or certificate issued by the Department of Pesticide Regulation.(b) The Department of Pesticide Regulation shall levy a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation of the prohibition in subdivision (a).SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact subsequent legislation to restrict the use of pesticides containing glyphosate for nonagricultural purposes.